Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.245.070

High school diplomas—Agreements with cooperating school districts—High school completion programs.

Skill centers may enter into agreements with one or more cooperating school districts to grant a high school diploma on behalf of the district so that students who are juniors and seniors have an opportunity to attend the skill center on a full-time basis without coenrollment at a district high school. To avoid competition with other high schools in the cooperating district, high school completion programs operated by skill centers shall be designed as dropout prevention and retrieval programs for at-risk and credit-deficient students or for fifth-year seniors. A skill center may use grant awards from the building bridges program under RCW 28A.175.025 to develop high school completion programs as provided in this section.

[ 2008 c 170 s 203.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2008 c 170: See RCW 28A.700.005.